inc/flattened/verb_suffixes_flattened_glossing.lexc
LEXICON VTA_n_TAG
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>w #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+2+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>waa%>%>goban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>w%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>w%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+4+Prt+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>ini%>%>goban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>wi%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+Dub+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>wi%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+Dub+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>wi%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>wi%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+Prt+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>wi%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+Prt+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>wi%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+Prt+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>%>goban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>w #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+2+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>waa%>%>goban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>w%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>w%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+4+Prt+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>ini%>%>goban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>wi%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+Dub+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>wi%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+Dub+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>wi%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>wi%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+Prt+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>wi%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+Prt+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>wi%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+Prt+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>%>goban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+X:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>m #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+X+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>m%>%>i%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+X+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>m%>%>a%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+X+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>m%>%>i%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+X+Prt+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>m%>%>i%>%>goban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+X:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>m #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+X+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>m%>%>i%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+X+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>m%>%>a%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+X+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>m%>%>i%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+X+Prt+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>m%>%>i%>%>goban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person.2@+VTA+ThmPas+2+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person.2@n%>%>igoo%>%>mw #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person.2@+VTA+ThmPas+2+Pl+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person.2@n%>%>igoo%>%>mw%>%>aa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person.2@+VTA+ThmPas+2+Pl+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person.2@n%>%>igoo%>%>mw%>%>aa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person.2@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+2+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person.2@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>mw #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person.2@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+2+Pl+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person.2@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>mw%>%>aa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person.2@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+2+Pl+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person.2@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>mw%>%>aa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@+VTA+ThmPas:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@n%>%>igoo #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+1+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>min2 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+1+Pl+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>min2%>%>aa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+1+Pl+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>min2%>%>aa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>naa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+1+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>min2 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+1+Pl+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>min2%>%>aa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+1+Pl+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>min2%>%>aa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>naa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>c1sii%>%>naa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>naa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>w #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+2+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>waa%>%>goban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>w%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>w%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+4+Prt+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>ini%>%>goban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>wi%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+Dub+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>wi%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+Dub+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>wi%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>wi%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+Prt+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>wi%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+Prt+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>wi%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+3+Prt+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>%>goban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>c1sii%>%>w #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+2+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>c1sii%>%>waa%>%>goban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>c1sii%>%>w%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>c1sii%>%>w%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+4+Prt+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>c1sii%>%>ini%>%>goban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>c1sii%>%>wi%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+Dub+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>c1sii%>%>wi%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+Dub+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>c1sii%>%>wi%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>c1sii%>%>wi%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+Prt+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>c1sii%>%>wi%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+Prt+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>c1sii%>%>wi%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+3+Prt+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>c1sii%>%>%>goban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+X:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>c1sii%>%>m #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+X+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>c1sii%>%>m%>%>i%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+X+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>c1sii%>%>m%>%>a%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+X+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>c1sii%>%>m%>%>i%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+Neg+X+Prt+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>c1sii%>%>m%>%>i%>%>goban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+X:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>m #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+X+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>m%>%>i%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+X+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>m%>%>a%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+X+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>m%>%>i%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@+VTA+ThmPas+X+Prt+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>m%>%>i%>%>goban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>igoo #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Pl+2+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>igoo%>%>mw #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Pl+2+Pl+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>igoo%>%>mw%>%>aa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Pl+2+Pl+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>igoo%>%>mw%>%>aa%>%>ban2 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Pl+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>igoo%>%>naa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Pl+Neg:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>igoo%>%>sii #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Pl+Neg+2+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>igoo%>%>sii%>%>mw #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Pl+Neg+2+Pl+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>igoo%>%>sii%>%>mw%>%>aa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Pl+Neg+2+Pl+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>igoo%>%>sii%>%>mw%>%>aa%>%>ban2 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Pl+Neg+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>igoo%>%>sii%>%>naa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Pl+Neg+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>igoo%>%>sii%>%>naa%>%>ban2 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Pl+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>igoo%>%>naa%>%>ban2 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Sg:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>in #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Sg+2+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>in%>%>inimw #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Sg+2+Pl+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>in%>%>inimw%>%>aa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Sg+2+Pl+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>in%>%>inimw%>%>aa%>%>ban2 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Sg+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>in%>%>naa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Sg+Neg:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>isinoon #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Sg+Neg+2+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>isinoon%>%>inimw #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Sg+Neg+2+Pl+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>isinoon%>%>inimw%>%>aa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Sg+Neg+2+Pl+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>isinoon%>%>inimw%>%>aa%>%>ban2 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@+VTA+Thm1Sg+Neg+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@n%>%>isinoon%>%>naa%>%>dig #;
